Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1482.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sgt. Ronald Bloom Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Ronald Bloom was born October 21, 1946, in Clearfield County and was the son of Norman and Thelma Bloom.(2) During his free time, he enjoyed the outdoors, including fishing and hiking.(3) Ronald Bloom attended Saint Francis High School in Clearfield, however he dropped out during his senior year to enlist in the Marines.(4) He enlisted in the Marines on May 27, 1967, and rose to the rank of Sergeant.(5) On August 2, 1968, at 21 years of age, Sergeant 123456789101112131415161718 Bloom was killed in action in Quang Tri, Vietnam.(6) During his service, Sergeant Bloom received the Purple Heart, the Good Conduct Medal, the National Defense Service Medal, The Vietnam Service Medal with two stars and the Republic of Vietnam Campaign Medal.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 48006, carrying State Route 3007 over Carson Run in Knox Township, Clearfield County, is designated the Sgt. Ronald Bloom Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1482PN1736 - 2 - 1234567891011121314